Tennessee statutes. Title 1 Code And Statutes
Chapter 1

Code Commission

1-1-101. Composition of commission — Vacancies.

There is created a Tennessee code commission of five (5) members composed of the chief justice of the supreme court, the attorney general and reporter, a director of the office of legal services for the general assembly, and two (2) other members appointed by the chief justice.

In the event of a vacancy for any cause in the appointed membership, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the chief justice.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 1; 1977, ch. 89, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-101; Acts 2016, ch. 603, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee code commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “a” for “the” preceding “director” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 603, § 4. March 17, 2016.

Cross-References. Reproduction, publication and sale of T.C.A. to be pursuant to this chapter, § 3-10-108.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191 (1978).

1-1-102. Chair — Executive secretary.

The chief justice shall serve as chair of the commission.

The revisor of statutes within the office of legal services for the general assembly shall serve as executive secretary of the commission.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 6; 1977, ch. 89, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-102; Acts 2016, ch. 603, § 2.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “The revisor of statutes within” for “The director of the office of” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 603, § 4. March 17, 2016.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191 (1978).

1-1-103. Staff services for commission.

The office of legal services for the general assembly shall provide all staff services for the commission.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 2; 1977, ch. 89, § 18; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-103.

1-1-104. Successor to 1953 commission.

The Tennessee code commission, created by § 1-1-101, shall be the immediate successor to the commission created by Chapter 80 of the Public Acts of 1953.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 7; 1977, ch. 89, § 19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-104.

Compiler's Notes. Section 1 of Public Acts of 1953, ch. 80, referred to in this section, reads:

“There is created a Tennessee code commission of five members composed of a chief justice of the Supreme Court of Tennessee, the attorney general and reporter and three other members. The commission as originally constituted shall be composed of the following members: A. B. Neil, chief justice of the Supreme Court, Roy H. Beeler, attorney-general and reporter, Sam L. Felts, Sr., Alfred P. Adams, Sr., and Harry Phillips. Whoever shall occupy the positions of chief justice and attorney general and reporter shall be members of such commission, in event of a vacancy for any cause among the other three members, the same shall be filled at appointment by the chief justice.”

1-1-105. Publication of Tennessee Code Annotated.

The Tennessee code commission is hereby authorized and directed to formulate and supervise the execution of plans for the compilation, arrangement, classification, annotation, editing, indexing, printing, binding, publication, sale, distribution and the performance of all other acts necessary for the publication of an official compilation of the statutes, codes and session laws of the state of Tennessee of a public and general nature, now existing and to be enacted in the future, including an electronically searchable database of such code, which official compilation shall be known as “Tennessee Code Annotated.”

“Publication,” as used in this chapter, includes the necessary actions by whatever means and in whatever form for development of a Tennessee Code database.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-105; Acts 1984, ch. 660, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Free distribution law inapplicable, § 12-6-102.

Preparation of additional indices, § 1-1-115.

Publication of court rules, § 16-3-405.

Reproduction, publication and sale of T.C.A. to be pursuant to this chapter, § 3-10-108.

Attorney General Opinions. Unconstitutional enactment not cured by codification or recaptioning, OAG 98-023 (1/23/98).

Unconstitutional enactment (Acts 1997, ch. 98) not eligible for codification, OAG 98-023 (1/23/98).

1-1-106. Powers of commission — Contracts.

The Tennessee code commission has full power and authority on behalf of the state of Tennessee to perform all acts and to negotiate and enter into all contracts necessary for and expedient to the successful production and publication of a revised compilation of the statutory laws of Tennessee, including the power and authority to enter into contracts with a law book publisher for the editing, compiling, annotating, indexing, printing, binding, publication, sale and distribution of the revised compilation and the performance and execution of all other publication plans formulated by the commission.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to render invalid or impair the obligations of any contract previously entered into by the commission for the purposes set forth in this section or with a suitable contractor for an electronically searchable database of such code.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 2; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-106; Acts 1984, ch. 660, § 3.

1-1-107. Specifications in contract — Price of supplements and replacement volumes.

Any contract with a law book publisher for the purposes referred to in §§ 1-1-105 and 1-1-106 shall prescribe the specifications for the publication of the revised compilation, including the size of type to be used in the text of the statutes and the annotations, the grade and weight of the paper to be used, the size of the volumes, appropriate provisions for the insertion of pocket supplements and the publication of replacement volumes, the price at which Tennessee Code Annotated shall be sold in Tennessee when originally published, and such other provisions as are necessary for the full performance of the publication plans formulated by the commission.

The price at which pocket supplements and replacement volumes are to be sold from time to time in Tennessee shall be controlled by the commission in such contracts as it may, from time to time, in its discretion execute.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-107.

Cross-References. Price of supplements and replacement volumes, § 1-1-113.

1-1-108. Substantive changes in text prohibited — Changes authorized — Effect of error in enrollment.

In preparing the manuscript of the revised compilation (including pocket supplements and replacement volumes) for publication and distribution, the commission shall not alter the sense, meaning or effect of any act of the general assembly, but shall copy the exact language of the text of the statutes, codes and session laws of a public and general nature of the state of Tennessee, except that the commission is authorized to rearrange, regroup and renumber the titles, chapters, sections and parts of sections of the statutes, codes and code supplements and to change reference numbers to agree with any renumbered chapter or section; to change the wording of and prepare new section headings and symbols; to substitute the proper section or chapter reference where the terms “this act” or “the preceding section” or similar expressions are used in the statutes; to correct manifest misspelling and typographical errors and to change capitalization and spelling for the purpose of uniformity; to change references to governmental agencies, departments and officers when part or all of the powers, rights and/or duties of such agencies, departments or officers have, by an act of the general assembly, been transferred to other agencies, departments or officers; to omit enacting clauses, repealing clauses, severability clauses, conditional clauses, preambles, captions and statements declaring legislative intent; and to make other stylistic, nonsubstantive changes if such changes are consistent with style guidelines that have been approved by the commission and submitted to the judiciary committee of the senate and the judiciary committee of the house of representatives. Where the application or effect of a statute, by its terms, depends on the time when the act creating the statute took effect, the commission may substitute the actual effective date for the various forms of expression which mean that date — such as “when this act (or chapter, or section) takes effect,” or “after (or before) the effective date of this act (or chapter, or section).” No such change shall be deemed an alteration of or departure from the enrolled statute.

When the commission is advised by certificate of the secretary of state that a bill which is signed by the governor, or passed over the governor's veto, or otherwise becomes a public act, differs, by reason of an error in the enrolling process or otherwise from such bill as passed on third reading by both houses of the general assembly, the commission will not compile the public act for codification, but will have a compiler's note inserted in the manuscript of Tennessee Code Annotated, which compiler's note shall set forth the facts revealed by the certificate received from the secretary of state in reference to such error.

Nothing in this subsection (b) shall affect the powers granted the commission under subsection (a).

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 4; 1968, ch. 442, § 1; 1970, ch. 378, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-108; Acts 2011, ch. 48, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 34; 2019, ch. 345, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “judiciary” for “civil justice” preceding “committee of the house” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Reproduction, publication and sale of T.C.A. to be pursuant to this chapter, § 3-10-108.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 566.

Law Reviews.

Underinsured Motorist Coverage in Tennessee, 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 663 (1976).

Attorney General Opinions. Re-engrossment of bills, OAG 95-093 (9/1/95).

1-1-109. Seal and certificate.

The commission has the authority to design and adopt an appropriate certificate and distinctive seal on behalf of the state, a copy of which shall be included in each copy of each volume and pocket supplement of “Tennessee Code Annotated.”

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-109.

1-1-110. Examination and certification of published volumes.

When the commission finds that the manuscript of the revised compilation hereby authorized or any volume or pocket supplement thereof as printed, edited, annotated, indexed and bound by the law book publisher pursuant to contract conforms to the commission's publication plans and meets and satisfies the requirements of this chapter and also the requirements of the publication contract entered into pursuant to the terms of this chapter, the commission shall prepare an appropriate written certificate of approval for each volume and pocket supplement, and the commission, acting through its executive secretary or other authorized officer, shall certify in writing that the commission has approved the manuscript of the compilation and that the text of each section of the statutes printed or appearing in such volume or pocket supplement has been compared with the original section appearing in the published copies of the public acts, and that, with the exception of changes in form permitted by § 1-1-108, the sections in the printed compilation are correctly and accurately copied.

One (1) copy of each edition of each volume and pocket supplement so approved, together with the original certificate of approval by the commission, shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

All other printed copies of each edition of each volume and pocket supplement shall contain a printed copy of the commission's certificate of approval.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-110.

Cross-References. Reproduction, publication and sale of T.C.A. to be pursuant to this chapter, § 3-10-108.

1-1-111. Official status — Prima facie evidence of law — Citation.

Upon appropriate certification of approval by the commission filed with the secretary of state as provided in § 1-1-110, the compilation in each volume and supplement so certified shall be in force.

The text of the statutes, codes and code supplements (but not the annotations, footnotes and other editorial matter) appearing in the printed copies of the compilation, containing a copy of the commission's certificate of approval, shall constitute prima facie evidence of the statutory law of this state and be received, recognized, referred to and used in all courts, agencies, departments, offices of and proceedings in the state as the official compilation of the statutory law, and may be cited as Tennessee Code Annotated or by the abbreviation “T.C.A.”

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-111.

Cross-References. References in statutes to T.C.A., § 1-2-101.

1-1-112. Uncertified compilations not recognized.

No compilation or codification of the statutes of Tennessee not bearing a copy of the certificate of approval of the code commission as provided in § 1-1-110 shall be recognized as an official compilation of the statutory law of Tennessee.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-112.

Cross-References. Reproduction, publication and sale of T.C.A. to be pursuant to this chapter, § 3-10-108.

1-1-113. Expenses — Costs of publication — Price.

The commission shall be authorized to expend such funds as may be appropriated by the general assembly for the purpose of this chapter. Such expenditures shall be made upon certification by the chief justice to the proper fiscal officers.

The commission shall not be authorized to subsidize the publication of the code out of public funds, but shall require that the cost of publication be borne by the publisher, and the publisher shall be required to depend for compensation upon the proceeds of the sale of the publication.

In contracting for the price at which the Tennessee Code Annotated and its pocket supplements and replacement volumes shall be sold in Tennessee, the commission is directed to keep the price at the lowest figure which in its discretion is consistent with high editorial and publishing quality.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-113.

Cross-References. Price of supplements and replacement volumes, § 1-1-107.

1-1-114. Recommendations for statutory changes.

The commission may prepare and submit to succeeding sessions of the general assembly its recommendations for the revision in substance and form or the repeal or amendment of certain statutes or any portion thereof, and submit bills for the accomplishment of such proposed revision, repeal or amendment.

Acts 1953, ch. 80, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-114.

Cross-References. Regulatory agencies not collecting fees sufficient to pay operating costs, § 4-29-121.

1-1-115. Preparation of additional indices.

The commission may prepare or cause to be prepared indices to the laws of Tennessee, in addition to such indices as are prepared in accordance with § 1-1-105, and in preparing such indices has the powers authorized by this chapter.

Acts 1982, ch. 649, § 1.

1-1-116. Changing references from “tax assessor” to “assessor of property.”

The code commission is directed to change all references to tax assessor in title 6, chapter 22, part 1; § 6-51-204; title 6, chapter 55, part 6; title 7, chapter 32, part 1; § 7-64-102; § 25-3-118; § 43-34-104; title 67; and title 69, chapter 6, part 1, wherever such references appear, to assessor of property as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced.

Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1.